Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-504
Operating record; furnished by department; contents; not admissible in evidence.

The department shall upon request furnish any person a certified abstract of the operating record of any person subject to the provisions of sections 60-501 to 60-569, which abstract shall also fully designate the motor vehicles, if any, registered in the name of such person, and, if there shall be no record of any conviction of such person of violating any law relating to the operation of a motor vehicle or of any injury or damage caused by such person, the department shall so certify. Such abstracts shall not be admissible as evidence in any action for damages or criminal proceedings arising out of a motor vehicle accident.

Laws 1949, c. 178, § 4, p. 485.